Utah statutes.
48-1d-503.   Sharing of and right to distributions before dissolution.

(1)  Any distributions made by a partnership before its dissolution and winding up must be in equal shares among partners, except to the extent necessary to comply with a transfer effective under Section 48-1d-603 or charging order in effect under Section 48-1d-604.

(2)  A person has a right to a distribution before the dissolution and winding up of a partnership only if the partnership decides to make an interim distribution.

(3)  A person does not have a right to demand or receive a distribution from a partnership in any form other than money.  Except as otherwise provided in Section 48-1d-906, a partnership may distribute an asset in kind only if each part of the asset is fungible with each other part and each person receives a percentage of the asset equal in value to the person's share of distributions.

(4)  If a partner or transferee becomes entitled to receive a distribution, the partner or transferee has the status of, and is entitled to all remedies available to, a creditor of the partnership with respect to the distribution.  However, the partnership's obligation to make a distribution is subject to offset for any amount owed to the partnership by the partner or a person dissociated as partner on whose account the distribution is made.



Enacted by Chapter 412, 2013 General Session

